Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-2977
Members' contributions.

The articles of organization or bylaws may establish the amount, manner, or method of determining any member contribution requirements for members or may authorize the board of directors to establish the manner and terms of any contributions for members.

Laws 2007, LB368, § 77.